Massachusetts, session 194th, H2601.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Mobile telephone” the
following definition:-
“Motorcoach”, a bus characterized by an elevated passenger deck located over a baggage
compartment, which transports passengers for hire as a business between fixed and regular
termini or under a charter license. The term “motorcoach” shall not include city buses operated
by a public transit system or school buses.
SECTION 2. Section 13A of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “vanpool vehicle”, in lines 2 and 3, the following word:- , motorcoach
SECTION 3. Said section 13A of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting before the word “buses”, in line 22, the following words:- standard city.
of 2

SECTION 4. Said section 13A of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The operator of a motorcoach service shall include in its ticket purchase agreement a
provision stating that the passenger agrees to wear a seatbelt when seated while the motorcoach
is in motion. The operator of a motorcoach service shall require its drivers to make an
announcement to the passengers prior to the motorcoach’s departure instructing the passengers to
wear seatbelts when seated while the motorcoach is in motion.
SECTION 5. The department of public utilities shall conduct a public information
campaign to educate the public on the importance of wearing a seatbelt while riding in a
motorcoach, as defined in section 1 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, and the safety risks of not
wearing a seatbelt on a motorcoach.
of 2